District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.06

Organization.

The Director is authorized to establish administrative divisions within DDOE as the Director considers necessary to increase effectiveness and further the purposes of this chapter, which such divisions may include:

(1)

An Energy Management and Air Quality Control Division, including the Office of Energy, to implement and administer clean air programs and initiatives, to administer programs to assist nonprofit, residential, commercial, industrial, and governmental consumers in becoming more energy efficient, and to be responsible for identifying and analyzing energy issues facing the District and its residents;

(2)

A Natural Resources and Water Quality Division to set policy, develop, implement, and oversee initiatives and activities to protect, restore, and enhance natural resources, such as initiatives for greening neighborhoods through community education and provision of materials, to operate and set policy for public grounds and tree management, the management of hazardous materials and toxic substances, underground storage tanks, and lead-based paint abatement and control, to set policy for vector control, to coordinate research, outreach, and rehabilitation efforts pertaining to the environment, to establish policies and programs to prevent and control water pollution, to increase the efficiency of wastewater and stormwater system regulation and soil resource management, and to conserve and enhance water quality in the District’s groundwater systems and in the waters adjacent to the District;

(3)

A Recycling and Solid Waste Management Division to establish policies and programs to support the District’s recycling initiative and to increase the efficiency of solid and hazardous waste management;

(4)

A Brownfields Redevelopment Division to identify, evaluate, remediate, and provide support to the appropriate District agencies or instrumentalities to rehabilitate sites where development is complicated by real or perceived environmental contamination;

(5)

A Government Relations and Policy Division to analyze existing environmental legislation and policy and provide strategic direction for new policy initiatives, to liaison with the Mayor’s Office, other District agencies, and federal agencies to advise on environmental issues and their impact on the District, to monitor federal environmental legislation and regulations, advance inter-governmental or intra-governmental agreements, where appropriate, to create general environmental policy positions for the District of Columbia, and to provide a centralized point of contact for all of the DDOE divisions to ensure the coherent development and advancement of policy and legislation; and

(6)

A Community Programming and Education Outreach Division to increase public awareness of DDOE’s ongoing environmental, educational, and outreach initiatives by informing District residents about the programs DDOE offers and the importance of everyone’s contribution to protecting and enhancing the environment, to ensure knowledge and accessibility of DDOE programs to the diversity of the District’s residents through presentations and use of printed resources and materials.

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 106, 52 DCR 10812

History